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DTC P0 110/24 IntakeAirTemp.CircuitMalfunction

CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION
The intake air temp. sensor is mounted on the air cleaner cap
and sensors the intake air temperature.
A thermistor built in the sensor changes the resistance value
according to the intake air temp. The lower the intake air temp.
the greater the thermistor resistance value, and the higher the
intake air temp. the lower the thermistor resistance value
(See fig.1).
Theair intake temp.sensor isconnected to theengineECU
(See below). The 5V power source voltage in the ECU is ap-
plied to the intake air temp. sensor from the terminal THA via
a resistor R.
That is the resistor R and the intake air temp. sensor are con-
nected in series. When the resistance value of the intake air
temperature sensor changes in accordance with changes in the
intake air temp. the potential at terminal THA also changes.
Based on this signal, the engine ECU increases the fuel injec-
tion volume to improve driveability during cold engine opera-
tion.
If theengineECUdetects theDTC”P0110/24”, it operates the
fail safe function in which the intake air temperature is assumed
tobe20 ˚ C(68 ˚ F).

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

O h t i i t k i t i it f 0 5
SOpenorshort in intakeair tem p.sensorcircuit

P0110/24
Openorshort in intakeair temp.sensorcircuit for0.5sec.or
more

SOpen orshort in intake air temp. sensor circuit
S Intakeair temp.sensorP0110/24

more
Intake airtemp . sensor

SEngineECU

HINT:
AfterconfirmingDTCP0110/24use thehand −held tester toconfirm the intakeair temperature from”CUR-
RENT DATA”.

Temperature Displayed Malfunction

− 40˚ C (− 40˚F) Open circuit

140˚ C(284 ˚F)ormore Short circuit
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WIRING DIAGRAM

INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Read freeze framedatausinghand −held tester.Because freeze framerecords theengineconditions

when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was runningorstopped, theenginewarmedupornot, theair −fuel ratio leanor rich,etc.at the time
of the malfunction.

S IfDTC”P0105/31” (VacuumSensorCircuitMalfunction), ”P0110/24” (IntakeAirTemp.CircuitMalfunc-
tion), ”P0115/22” (Water Temp. Circuit Malfunction), ”P0120/41” (Throttle Position Sensor Circuit Mal-
function) are output simultaneously, E2 (Sensor Ground) may be open.
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When using hand−held tester

1 Connect the hand−held tester, and read value of intake air temperature.

PREPARATION:
(a) Connect the hand−held tester to DLC3.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON and push the hand−held tester main switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Same as actual intake air temperature
HINT:
S If there is open circuit, hand−held tester indicates − 40˚ C (− 40˚F).
S If there is short circuit, hand− held tester indicates 140˚  C (284˚F)  or more.

NG −40˚ C (−40˚ F) .... Go to step 2.
140˚ C (284˚ F) or more .... Go to step 4.

OK

Check for intermittent problem
(See gage DI−4) .

2 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.
(b)Connect thesensorwireharness terminals together.
(c)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: 140˚ C(284 ˚ F)ormore

OK Confirm good connection at sensor. If OK, re-
place intake air temp. sensor.

NG
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3 Check for open in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Connect between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU.
HINT:
Intake air temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
Before checking, do a visual and contact pressure check for the
engine ECU connector (See page IN−19).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: 140˚ C (284˚ F) or more

OK Open in harness between terminals E2 or THA
repair or replace harness.

NG

Confirm good connection at engine ECU.
If OK, replace engine ECU.

4 Check for short in harness and engine ECU (See page IN−1 9) .

PREPARATION:
(a) Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.
(b)Turn the ignitionswitchON.
CHECK:
Read temperaturevalueon thehand −held tester.
OK:

Temperaturevalue: − 40˚ C (− 40˚ F)

OKReplace intakeair temp.sensor.

NG
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5 Check for short in harness or engine ECU.

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Disconnect the E12 connector of engine ECU.
HINT:
Intake air temp. sensor connector is disconnected.
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Read temperature value on the hand−held tester.
OK:

Temperature value: − 40˚C (− 40˚F)

OK Repair or replace harness or connector.

NG

Check and replace engine ECU
(See page IN−1 9) .
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When not using hand−held tester

1 Check voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine ECU connecter

PREPARATION:
(a) Remove the glove compartment door.
(b) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure voltage between terminals THA and E2 of engine
ECU connector.
OK:

Intake Air Temperature Voltage

20˚ C (68˚ F) 0.5 − 3.4 V

60˚ C (140˚ F) 0.2 − 1.0 V

OK Check for intermittent problem
(See page DI−4) .

NG

2 Check intake air temp. sensor.

PREPARATION:
Disconnect the intake air temp. sensor connector.
CHECK:
Measure resistance between terminals.
OK:

Resistance is within Acceptable Zone on chart.

Intake Air Temperature Resistance

20˚C (68˚F) 2 − 3 k�

80˚C (176˚F) 0.2 − 0.4 k�

NG Replace intake air temp. sensor.

OK
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3 Check for open and short in harness and connector between engine ECU and
intake air temp. sensor (See page IN−1 9) .

NG Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK

Check and replace engine ECU.


